District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0467.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Equitable Access to Financial Services Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The District government shall only enter into a contract to provide prepaid debit
cards and associated services to District employees and residents with an entity that has physical
locations in at least 5 wards, with preference given to an entity with physical locations in census
tracts with a median household income of $50,000 or less.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.


This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(l) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code§ l-206.02(c)(l)).